Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,101
Extension of benefits, defined.

Extension of benefits shall mean the continuation of coverage under a particular benefit provided under a contract following termination with respect to an enrollee who is totally disabled on the date of termination.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 10.